Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-814
Violators; parties to employment contract; injunction.

The court may also, in its discretion, enjoin the officers, agents, or servants of such corporation, joint-stock company, or other association or the managers, agents, or servants of such limited liability company from continuing in its service and enjoin any such corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association from continuing their employment therein as the case shall seem to require.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 11, p. 641;

R.S.1913, § 4055;

C.S.1922, § 3458;

C.S.1929, § 59-811;

R.S.1943, § 59-814;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 369;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 76.